North Dakota, session 69, HB1073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 37-17.1-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-17.1-22. Disaster or emergency response and recovery costs.
Whenever the governor declares a state of disaster or emergency in accordance with section
37-17.1-05, or when the governor enters into an agreement with the federal government following a
disaster or emergency declared by the president of the United States, the director of the division of
homeland security shall determine and record the costs of the state response and recovery operations
in accordance with an agreement with the federal government or in accordance with procedures
established by the governor in the case of a state-declared disaster or emergency. Immediately
following the response or recovery operations, or prior thereto if determined necessary by the governor,
the governor may apply to the state emergency commission for a grant of funds in an amount equal to
the response and recovery costs of the state to be paid from the state disaster relief fund or other funds
approved by the emergency commission. Notwithstanding other provisions of chapter 54-16, it must be
conclusively presumed upon receipt by the emergency commission of the application from the governor
that a disaster or emergency exists, and the commission may grant and direct the transfer to the
department of the governor designated representative of an amount up to that certified in the
application by the governor.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 37-17.1-23 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-17.1-23. Disaster or emergency recovery funding - Loan authorization.
1. When approved by the emergency commission, the office of the adjutant general is authorized
to borrow from the Bank of North Dakota, to match federal funds under the Robert T. Stafford
Disaster Emergency Assistance Act [Public Law 93-288, as amended]. In addition to the
principal repayment, the Bank of North Dakota shall receive interest on the loan at a rate
equal to other state agency borrowings. On behalf of the state, the office of the adjutant
general shall administer the disaster or emergency recovery program according to state
procedures based on federal laws or regulations. After a county or group of counties have
been declared a major disaster or emergency area by the president, the office of the adjutant
general shall submit a request to the emergency commission for:
a. Approval to make an application for a loan from the Bank of North Dakota;
b. Approval for additional personnel required to perform the anticipated recovery activities;
and
c. Authority to spend additional state and federal funds for the recovery program; and
d. Authority to spend available funds from the state disaster relief fund.

H. B. NO. 1073 - PAGE 2
2. If the request is acceptable, the emergency commission shall approve the request and issue a
notice of its action to the office of the adjutant general, Bank of North Dakota, and the office of
management and budget. The office of the adjutant general shall keep the emergency
commission apprised of the progress of the recovery operation and submit a final report upon
completion of the project. The office of the adjutant general is responsible to repay any loan,
including accrued interest, from the Bank of North Dakota which is provided under this section.
If at the end of the biennium a balance exists on the loan, the office of the adjutant general
shall request the legislative assembly for a deficiency appropriation to repay the loan.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 37-17.1-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
37-17.1-27. State disaster relief fund - Creation - Uses.
There is created in the state treasury a state disaster relief fund. Moneys in the fund are to be used
subject to legislative appropriations for providing the required state share of funding for expenses and
administration associated with emergency response operations conducted by the department of
emergency services, a declaration of a state of disaster or emergency issued by the governor in
accordance with section 37 - 17.1 - 05 , federal emergency management agency disaster response,
recovery, and mitigation grants, and for the purposes of reimbursing costs under section 37-17.1-28.
Any interest or other fund earnings must be deposited in the fund. Before any expenditure is made from
the fund, the agency authorized to make the expenditure shall provide information on the purpose and
payee of the expenditure to the appropriation committees of the house of representatives and senate or
to the budget section if the legislative assembly is not in session.

H. B. NO. 1073 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1073.
House Vote: Yeas 73 Nays 20 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State